Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1810
Purchase of slaughter livestock; effect of section.

Nothing in section 54-1809 shall be considered a limitation placed upon any purchaser of slaughter livestock to conduct business or other financial affairs or place accounts with any other financial institutions outside the state.

Laws 1975, LB 436, § 2.